Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6175.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1280h. (1) By not later than January 1, 2028, the department shall develop a system of expanded accountability measurements to provide additional information on public schools designated as alternative education campuses. The department shall designate a public school as an alternative education campus if the public school meets at least 1 of the following: (a) The public school is a strict discipline academy established under section 1311b to 1311l. (b) The public school operates a dropout recovery and prevention program as described in section 23a of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1623a. (c) The public school exclusively operates as an adult education program as described in section 107 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1707. (d) The public school has previously been identified and approved by the department as an alternative education campus or received an alternative education emphasis from the center. (2) By not later than June 30, 2028, and each June 30 thereafter, the department shall assign a rating of 0 to 100 to each public school designated as an alternative education campus under subsection (1). A rating assigned under this subsection must be included in public-facing reports and must only be in comparison with other public schools designated as alternative education campuses. The rating assigned under this subsection must be based on the criteria currently measured through the Michigan school index in compliance with section 1111(c)(4)(D) of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 USC 6311, and must be determined as follows: (a) Student growth must be the primary factor considered and must receive a weight of at least 3 times that assigned to student proficiency under subdivision (c) when determining a rating under this subsection. (b) Graduation rate must be the second factor considered when determining a rating under this subsection. Graduation rate must be assigned the same weight as student growth as described in subdivision (a) when determining a rating under this subsection. The consideration of an alternative education campus's graduation rate under this subdivision must incorporate extended-year adjusted cohort graduation rates, including cohorts of up to 8 years, consistent with federal requirements. (c) Student proficiency data must not consider data for students until they have been enrolled in the alternative education campus for a full academic year when determining a rating under this subsection. Student proficiency data may be considered with additional weight for students with extended enrollment of 2 or more full academic years at the alternative education campus, consistent with state and federal full academic year requirements. (d) A rating assigned under this subsection for a public school must include clearly defined and publicly reported weighting of the criteria described in subdivision (a), (b), and (c) and the following criteria: (i) English learner progress. (ii) Assessment participation rates. (iii) School quality and student success. (iv) Any other factors currently measured through the Michigan school index. (3) For each public school that receives a rating under subsection (2), the department shall do both of the following: (a) Describe all criteria considered toward the rating, including those criteria under subsection (2) and any supplemental criteria considered reasonably appropriate for alternative education programs. (b) Describe the process for, and the stakeholders involved in, the design and implementation of the expanded accountability model, including opportunities for stakeholder input. (4) The rating provided under subsection (2) must include expected performance levels for each measurement based on data gathered by the department. The data gathered by the department under this subsection must be exclusively from public schools designated as alternative education campuses. (5) The data publicly reported under subsection (2) must be reported as alternative education campus data and separately from public schools not designated as alternative education campuses. Any comparison reports must include only alternative education campus data. (6) For any alternative education campus that is identified for comprehensive support and improvement, targeted support and improvement, or additional targeted support, under section 1111 of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 USC 6311, intervention plans must be aligned with the design and purpose of alternative education programs and must incorporate evidence-based strategies and methods appropriate for the populations served by such programs. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Campus" means any physical, online, or hybrid school setting as determined by the department. (b) "Center" means the center for educational performance and information created under section 94a of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1694a.